Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-643
Lottery; local control; section, how construed.

(1) Any county, city, or village may, by resolution or ordinance, tax, regulate, control, or prohibit any lottery conducted pursuant to the Nebraska County and City Lottery Act within the boundaries of such county, city, or village, except that no county may impose a tax or otherwise regulate, control, or prohibit any lottery within the corporate limits of a city or village. Any tax imposed pursuant to this subsection shall be remitted to the general fund of the county, city, or village imposing such tax.

(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize any lottery not otherwise authorized under Nebraska law.

Laws 1989, LB 767, § 83;

Laws 1993, LB 563, § 16.